Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 2

Assessment and Levy

6-34-201. Assessments generally.

The council may, by ordinance, provide for the assessment, by city assessing personnel, of property lying within the corporate limits, or may enter into any necessary agreements with the appropriate county officials for joint assessments by the city and county, or may elect to use county assessments. There shall be added to any county assessment any property omitted from such assessments.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.04; T.C.A., § 6-3401.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-34-202. Notice and hearing on assessments — Appeal.

Every owner of property liable for taxes based on increased or new assessment shall be sent the notice thereof by ordinary mail or by personal service. If the owner of such property is unknown, or is a nonresident of the state with no known agent in the state, a notice stating the time and place when the taxpayer may be heard shall be posted on the property at least ten (10) days in advance of the date set for the hearing.

A notice of the board's decision shall be mailed to the taxpayer within five (5) days after the hearing.

Thereafter appeals may be taken as provided by general law.

If the taxpayer fails to appear at such hearing, or does not file an appeal within the time allowed by general law, the assessment shall stand.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.09; T.C.A., § 6-3406.

6-34-203. Levy, due date, and delinquencies.

Unless otherwise provided by ordinance, the schedule for levy, due date and delinquencies shall be the same as provided by general law for counties; provided, that the tax levy shall be set by council not later than sixty (60) days preceding the new fiscal year, except as provided in § 6-34-204.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.10; T.C.A., § 6-3407.

6-34-204. Levy for school budget.

In the event a tax levy for the fiscal year is found to be insufficient to meet the requirements of a school budget increased by reason of a referendum provided for in § 6-36-114, the council shall have authority to amend the tax levy ordinance so as to raise the levy contained therein in an amount sufficient to cover the deficiency.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.11; T.C.A., § 6-3408.

6-34-205. Previous year's levy to continue if no levy made.

If no levy is made at the time fixed for the levy, the previous year's levy shall continue in effect.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.12; T.C.A., § 6-3409.